North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Part 4. Ambulatory Surgical Facility Licensure.

§ 131E-145.
Title; purpose.

This Part shall be known as the “Ambulatory Surgical Facility Licensure Act.”

The purpose of this Part is to provide for the development, establishment and enforcement of basic standards:

For the care and treatment of individuals in ambulatory surgical facilities; and

For the maintenance and operation of ambulatory surgical facilities so as to ensure safe and adequate treatment of such individuals in ambulatory surgical facilities.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1214, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-146.
Definitions.

As used in this Part, unless otherwise specified:

“Ambulatory surgical facility” means a facility designed for the provision of a specialty ambulatory surgical program or a multispecialty ambulatory surgical program. An ambulatory surgical facility serves patients who require local, regional or general anesthesia and a period of post-operative observation. An ambulatory surgical facility may only admit patients for a period of less than 24 hours and must provide at least one designated operating room as defined in subdivision (1c) of this section or at least one gastrointestinal endoscopy room as defined in subdivision (1b) of this section and at least one designated recovery room, have available the necessary equipment and trained personnel to handle emergencies, provide adequate quality assurance and assessment by an evaluation and review committee, and maintain adequate medical records for each patient. An ambulatory surgical facility may be operated as a part of a physician or dentist’s office, provided the facility is licensed under G.S. Chapter 131E, Article 6, Part 4, but the performance of incidental, limited ambulatory surgical procedures which do not constitute an ambulatory surgical program as defined in subdivision (1a) and which are performed in a physician or dentist’s office does not make that office an ambulatory surgical facility.

(1a)

“Ambulatory surgical program” means a formal program for providing on a same-day basis those surgical procedures which require local, regional or general anesthesia and a period of post-operative observation to patients whose admission for more than 24 hours is determined, prior to surgery or gastrointestinal endoscopy, to be medically unnecessary.

(1b)

“Gastrointestinal endoscopy room” means a room used for the performance of procedures that require the insertion of a flexible endoscope into a gastrointestinal orifice to visualize the gastrointestinal lining and adjacent organs for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes.

(1c)

“Operating room” means a room used for the performance of surgical procedures requiring one or more incisions and that is required to comply with all applicable licensure codes and standards for an operating room.

“Commission” means the North Carolina Medical Care Commission.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1214, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1064, s. 1; 1997-456, s. 49(a); 2001-242, s. 1; 2005-346, s. 4.

§ 131E-147.
Licensure requirement.

No person shall operate an ambulatory surgical facility without a license obtained from the Department.

Applications shall be available from the Department, and each application filed with the Department shall contain all necessary and reasonable information that the Department may by rule require. A license shall be granted to the applicant upon a determination by the Department that the applicant has complied with the provisions of this Part and the rules promulgated by the Commission under this Part. The Department shall charge the applicant a nonrefundable annual base license fee in the amount of eight hundred fifty dollars ($850.00) plus a nonrefundable annual per-operating room fee in the amount of seventy-five dollars ($75.00).

A license to operate an ambulatory surgical facility shall be annually renewed upon the filing and the department’s approval of a renewal application. The renewal application shall be available from the Department and shall contain all necessary and reasonable information that the Department may by rule require.

Each license shall be issued only for the premises and persons named in the application and shall not be transferable or assignable except with the written approval of the Department.

Licenses shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1214, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 2003-284, s. 34.5(a); 2005-276, s. 41.2(e); 2009-451, s. 10.76(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 41.2(e), effective October 1, 2005, in subsection (b), substituted “seven hundred dollars ($700.00)” for “three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00)” and “fifty dollars ($50.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00).”

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 10.76(b), effective August 14, 2009, in subsection (b), in the last sentence, substituted “eight hundred fifty dollars ($850.00)” for “seven hundred dollars ($700.00)” near the middle, and “seventy-five dollars ($75.00)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00)” at the end.

§ 131E-147.1.
Fair billing and collections practices for ambulatory surgical facilities.

All ambulatory surgical facilities licensed under this Part shall be subject to the fair billing and collections practices set out in

G.S. 131E-91

.

History.

2013-382, s. 13.3.

§ 131E-148.
Adverse action on a license.

Subject to subsection (b), the Department is authorized to deny a new or renewal application for a license, and to amend, recall, suspend or revoke an existing license upon a determination that there has been a substantial failure to comply with the provisions of this Part or the rules promulgated under this Part.

The provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Administrative Procedure Act, shall govern all administrative action and judicial review in cases where the Department has taken the action described in subsection (a).

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1214, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 1.

§ 131E-149.
Rules and enforcement.

The Commission is authorized to adopt, amend and repeal all rules necessary for the implementation of this Part. These rules shall be no stricter than those issued by the Commission under

G.S. 131E-79

of the Hospital Licensing Act.

The Department shall enforce the rules adopted or amended by the Commission with respect to ambulatory surgical facilities.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1214, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-150.
Inspections.

The Department shall make or cause to be made inspections of ambulatory surgical facilities as necessary. The Department is authorized to delegate to a State officer, agent, board, bureau or division of State government the authority to make inspections according to the rules adopted by the Commission. The Department may revoke this delegated authority in its discretion.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 8-53

, “Communications between physician and patient,” or any other provision of law relating to the confidentiality of communications between physician and patient, the representatives of the Department who make these inspections may review any writing or other record in any recording medium which pertains to the admission, discharge, medication, treatment, medical condition, or history of persons who are or have been patients of the facility being inspected unless that patient objects in writing to review of that patient’s records. Physicians, psychologists, psychiatrists, nurses, and anyone else involved in giving treatment at or through a facility who may be interviewed by representatives of the Department may disclose to these representatives information related to an inquiry, notwithstanding the existence of the physician-patient privilege in

G.S. 8-53

, “Communication between physician and patient,” or any other rule of law; Provided the patient has not made written objection to this disclosure. The facility, its employees, and any person interviewed during these inspections shall be immune from liability for damages resulting from the disclosure of any information to the Department. Any confidential or privileged information received from review of records or interviews shall be kept confidential by the Department and not disclosed without written authorization of the patient or legal representative, or unless disclosure is ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction. The Department shall institute appropriate policies and procedures to ensure that this information shall not be disclosed without authorization or court order. The Department shall not disclose the name of anyone who has furnished information concerning a facility without the consent of that person. Neither the names of persons furnishing information nor any confidential or privileged information obtained from records or interviews shall be considered “public records” within the meaning of

G.S. 132-1

, “ ‘Public records’ defined.” Prior to releasing any information or allowing any inspections referred to in this section, the patient must be advised in writing by the facility that the patient has the right to object in writing to this release of information or review of the records and that by objecting in writing, the patient may prohibit the inspection or release of the records.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1214, s. 1; 1981, c. 586, s. 5; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

See Opinion of Attorney General to Mr. I. O. Wilkerson, Jr., Director, Division of Facility Services, 51 N.C.A.G. 17 (1981), rendered under former G.S. 131B-7.

§ 131E-151.
Penalties.

A person who owns in whole or in part or operates an ambulatory surgical facility without a license is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, and upon conviction will be subject only to a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense and not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each subsequent offense. Each day of continuing violation after conviction is considered a separate offense.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1214, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 962; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 131E-152.
Injunction.

Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the Department may, in the manner provided by law, maintain an action in the name of the State for injunction or other process against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent the establishment, conduct, management or operation of an ambulatory surgical facility without a license.

If any person shall hinder the proper performance of duty of the Secretary or a representative in carrying out the provisions of this Part, the Secretary may institute an action in the superior court of the county in which the hindrance occurred for injunctive relief against the continued hindrance, irrespective of all other remedies at law.

Actions under this section shall be in accordance with Article 37 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes and Rule 65 of the Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1214, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§§ 131E-153,
131E-154.

Reserved for future codification purposes.